Washington statutes.
RCW 2.04.050

Style of process.

Its process shall run in the name of the "State of Washington," bear test in the name of the chief justice, be signed by the clerk of the court, dated when issued, sealed with the seal of the court, and made returnable according to law, or such rule or orders as may be prescribed by the court.

[ 1890 p 323 s 11; RRS s 6.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: SAR-Rule 2.